Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.1783 is amended to read as follows:
In order to improve access to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, reduce
administrative costs associated with the program, [and ]enhance program integrity, and
support new dietary guidelines, and promote better health outcomes of participants and
the use of healthy food for nutrition purposes, the cabinet shall:
(1) Within one hundred eighty (180) days after July 14, 2022:
(a) Establish a transitional benefit alternative as described in 7 C.F.R. secs.
273.26 to 273.32;
(b) Request a waiver from the United States Department of Agriculture to
implement:
1. An Elderly Simplified Application Project for individuals who have no
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1583
earned income and who are over sixty (60) years of age or who are
disabled; and
2. A standard medical deduction waiver for individuals who are over sixty
(60) years of age or are disabled;
(c) Establish procedures to allow Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
beneficiaries to recertify eligibility online;
(d) To the extent permitted under federal law, develop and implement an online
employment and training program, as defined in 7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(d)(4), for
any individual that is subject to work requirements under 7 U.S.C. sec.
2015(d)(1);
(e) Request a waiver from the United States Department of Agriculture relating to
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance time limit exception established in 7
C.F.R. sec. 273.24(c)(4); and
(f) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to administer this section;[ and]
(2) Within ninety (90) days after July 14, 2022, require all households receiving
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance benefits, except for those households described
in subsection (1)(b) of this section, to comply with the change reporting
requirements permitted pursuant to 7 C.F.R. sec. 273.12(a); and
(3) (a) On or before November 30, 2026, the cabinet shall request a waiver from
the United States Department of Agriculture to prohibit the purchase of
accessory foods and any other food items of minimal nutritional value, as
determined by the cabinet, with Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Accessory food" means a food item excluded from the definition of a
staple food under 7 C.F.R. sec. 271.2, and includes the following:
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1583
a. Candy;
b. Soft drinks; and
c. Specialty coffee drinks;
2. "Candy":
a. Means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or
artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts,
or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces; and
b. Shall not include any preparation containing flour or any item
requiring refrigeration;
3. "Soft drinks":
a. Means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial
sweeteners; and
b. Shall not include beverages that contain milk or milk products,
soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty percent
(50%) of vegetable or fruit juice by volume; and
4. "Specialty coffee drinks" means a nonalcoholic coffee or coffee-based
beverage containing fewer than sixteen (16) fluid ounces of product
per bottle, can, or carton, whether individually packaged or packaged
in a group container, and containing at least twenty (20) grams of
sugar or any amount of artificial sweetener.
(c) The cabinet shall appear before the Interim Joint Committee on Health
Services at three (3) separate committee meetings to provide updates:
1. At the start of the waiver application drafting process;
2. When the waiver application is substantially complete; and
3. After the waiver application has been submitted to the United States
Department of Agriculture.
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1583
(d) If a waiver is granted, the secretary shall prohibit the purchase of accessory
foods and any other food items of minimal nutritional value, as determined
by the cabinet, with Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.
(e) If a waiver is not granted, the secretary, if instructed by the General
Assembly in accordance with KRS 205.525, shall resubmit the waiver with
modifications based on instructions from the General Assembly.
(f) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A necessary to administer this section.
(4) (a) On or before November 30, 2026, the cabinet shall request a waiver from
the United States Department of Agriculture to allow hot foods, as excluded
in 7 C.F.R. sec. 271.2, to be purchased from grocery stores using
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Grocery store":
a. Means a store engaged primarily in the retail sale of packaged
food, rather than food prepared for consumption on the
premises; and
b. Does not include convenience stores or gas stations;
2. "Hot foods":
a. Means any meat, poultry, or fish food product that is hot at the
point of sale, regardless of who cooks or heats it; and
b. Does not include coffee, tea, or any substantially coffee-based or
tea-based beverage.
(c) The cabinet shall appear before the Interim Joint Committee on Health
Services at three (3) separate committee meetings to provide updates:
1. At the start of the waiver application drafting process;
2. When the waiver application is substantially complete; and
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:42 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1583
3. After the waiver application has been submitted to the United States
Department of Agriculture.
(d) If a waiver is granted, the secretary shall allow the purchase of hot foods at
grocery stores with Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.
(e) If a waiver is not granted, the secretary, if instructed by the General
Assembly in accordance with KRS 205.525, shall resubmit the waiver with
modifications based on instructions from the General Assembly.
(f) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A necessary to administer this section.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/26/2026 1:42 PM Jacketed